Washington statutes.
RCW 9.73.050

Admissibility of intercepted communication in evidence.

Any information obtained in violation of RCW 9.73.030 or pursuant to any order issued under the provisions of RCW 9.73.040 shall be inadmissible in any civil or criminal case in all courts of general or limited jurisdiction in this state, except with the permission of the person whose rights have been violated in an action brought for damages under the provisions of RCW 9.73.030 through 9.73.080, or in a criminal action in which the defendant is charged with a crime, the commission of which would jeopardize national security.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 93 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—1967 ex.s. c 93: See note following RCW 9.73.030.